Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-238
County fair board; compliance with Open Meetings Act and Records Management Act.

County fair boards established under sections 2-221 to 2-231 shall comply with the Open Meetings Act and the Records Management Act.

Laws 1992, LB 398, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 16;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 2.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.